Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11
Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §
6341, provided: “Effect of transfer on retirement system membership and health insurance plan participation.

“(a)

As used in this section, ‘retirement system’ means:

“(1)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq.;

“(2)

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

“(3)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

“(4)

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

“(5)

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

“(6)

An alternate retirement plan for:

“(A)

A college, university, or the Department of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; and

“(B)

A vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.;

“(7)

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“(8)

A firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund provided for under § 24-11-101 et seq.

“(b)

If this act results in an employee who is a current member of a retirement system prior to the effective date of this act being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different retirement system than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act by written election and notice to the new employer and affected retirement system, make a one-time choice to:

“(1)

Remain in his or her same retirement system prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Become a member of the retirement system of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions for a reciprocal member to be transferred as an active member to a reciprocal system as currently provided by law under the system to which the reciprocal member is transferred.

“(c)

If this act results in an employee being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different health insurance plan than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, make a one-time choice between:

“(1)

Continuing to participate in his or her health insurance plan prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Participating in the health insurance plan of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law.

“(d)(1)(A)

A retirement system may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (b) of this section.

“(B)

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (c) of this section.

“(2)

A policy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.”

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Payment to dependents of police officers and fire fighters killed in the line of duty, § 21-5-701 et seq.

Scholarships for children of law enforcement officers and fire fighters disabled or killed in line of duty, § 6-82-501 et seq.

State police retirement system, § 24-6-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 839, § 4: Apr. 11, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that firemen's and policemen's pension and relief funds should not be permitted to incur additional actuarial commitments which will cause their actuarial soundness to deteriorate, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable those firemen's and policemen's pension and relief funds which have access to additional financial resources to increase survivor benefits without causing a deterioration in the actuarial soundness of the funds, and without creating similar obligations in other pension funds. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1570, § 10: Apr. 15, 1999. The emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund need to be amended concerning the distribution and allocation of funds and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 41, § 37: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-11-101. Legislative intent.

The provisions of this subchapter are intended to establish procedures whereby the benefits to members and beneficiaries under the firemen's relief and pension funds and the policemen's pension and relief funds within the respective municipalities of this state may be increased on an orderly basis without a deterioration of actuarial soundness and are further intended to establish procedures for review and certification in order that the proposed increase in pension and relief fund benefits will not result in a deterioration of actuarial soundness prior to the adoption or implementation thereof.

It is not the intent of this subchapter to repeal or modify any of the existing firemen's relief and pension fund or policemen's pension and relief fund laws of this state, and this subchapter shall be construed to supplement and to be in addition to any of those laws in effect.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 839, § 3; 1981, No. 283, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2232.

24-11-102. Increase in benefits.

The board of trustees of a municipal firemen's relief and pension fund and the board of trustees of a policemen's pension and relief fund are authorized to increase benefits for future or current retired members and beneficiaries of the firemen's relief and pension fund or policemen's pension and relief fund.

Any proposed increase by the board of trustees shall be in strict compliance with the following conditions:

The board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund shall adopt a resolution approved by not less than three-fourths (¾) of the membership of the board of trustees, outlining the proposed increase in benefits;

The action proposed by the board of trustees under the resolution shall be determined by an actuarial valuation to be actuarially feasible to the extent that the unfunded liabilities resulting from the proposed increase in member or beneficiary benefits under the fund will be funded over a period of not more than thirty (30) years, pursuant to rules promulgated by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, based on the current available and known revenue or income sources available to the retirement and pension fund.

The actuarial valuations shall be made by an actuary who is a member of the American Academy of Actuaries and who is employed by the review board.

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall state the actuarial findings in writing to the board of trustees and shall certify the appropriate action to be taken;

A copy of the resolution adopted by the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund outlining the proposed increase in member or beneficiary benefits is filed with the executive director, who shall determine that an actuarial valuation has been made in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter and that the actuarial valuation had determined that the proposed increase in benefits may be funded, over a period of time set forth in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, based on available or defined revenue sources of the relief fund, in which event the executive director may approve the proposed increase to member beneficiary benefits under the firemen's relief and pension fund or the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund.

The board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or policemen's pension and relief fund shall comply with the appropriate action as approved by the executive director; and

A copy of the resolution adopted by the board of trustees, a copy of the actuarial valuation, and a copy of the action taken by the executive director are filed with the circuit clerk and the city clerk of the county and city in which the firemen's relief and pension fund or policemen's pension and relief fund is located.

All actions taken by the executive director shall be subject to review and acceptance by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

If it is determined by the review board that a local pension plan is not complying with the provisions of law governing benefit increases, the executive director shall certify that noncompliance to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration who shall withhold all moneys otherwise due the plan from the state until compliance is achieved.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 839, § 1; 1981, No. 283, § 1; 1983, No. 329, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2230; Acts 1987, No. 279, § 2; 1995, No. 684, § 1; 2013, No. 41, § 1; 2015, No. 1165, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3559.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “an actuarial valuation” for “actuarial evaluation” in (b)(2)(A); substituted “are filed” for “is filed” in (b)(4)(A); and substituted “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration who” for “Insurance Commissioner, and the commissioner” in (c).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board” for “review board” in (b)(4)(B).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (c).

24-11-103. Actuarial valuation.

The cost of actuarial valuation made under the provisions of § 24-11-102 shall be paid by the board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the board of trustees of the policemen's pension and relief fund which proposes to increase member or beneficiary benefits under the fund.

The actuarial valuation shall include:

The current financial and actuarial status of the income and liabilities of the firemen's relief and pension fund or policemen's pension and relief fund;

A detailed statement of the proposed benefit increases;

A comparison reflecting that the level of contributions and other income under the pension and relief fund is sufficient to amortize the unfunded liabilities resulting from the benefit increase over a thirty-year period; and

A valuation determining whether, in the opinion of the actuary, the benefit increase, in conjunction with the addition of resources to reserves to increase actuarial soundness, will result in a deterioration of the actuarial soundness of the fund.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 839, § 2; 1981, No. 283, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-2231.

24-11-104. Rules.

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to promulgate such reasonable rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of §§ 24-11-301 and 24-11-809.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1570, § 6; 2013, No. 41, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2897.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “§§ 24-11-301 and 24-11-809” for “§§ 24-11-301, 24-11-302, 24-11-809, and 24-11-810.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading and in the text.

24-11-105. Survivor benefits for spouses who remarry.

The board of trustees of the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the board of trustees of the local policemen's pension and relief fund may elect to continue paying survivor benefits to spouses who remarry after they begin receiving benefits under the plan. However, before the election is effective, the election shall be approved by a majority vote of the governing body of the political subdivision, if any, after the plan meets the requirements for benefit increases under § 24-11-102.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1736, § 1.

Subchapter 2
— Disclosure of Financial Condition — Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 700, § 6: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that there exists a severe need for a more adequate system of disclosure of financial condition of Firemen's and Policemen's Pension Funds. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1983, No. 45, § 3: Feb. 3, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current requirement of an accountant's certification of the financial report places an extreme hardship on small funds and that this Act is necessary to provide needed relief while ensuring fiscal responsibility. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 512, § 5: July 1, 1983.

Acts 1985, No. 898, § 3: Apr. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the current requirement of an accountant's certification of the financial report places an extreme hardship on small funds and that this Act is necessary to provide needed relief while ensuring fiscal responsibility. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 992, § 7: Jan. 1, 1986.

Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 7: Jan. 1, 1995.

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1452, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that many of the retired police officers are not receiving adequate benefits, that often times, these officers have few financial resources outside of their pensions, that the policemen's pension and relief funds are often not able to pay full benefits to these officers because of their unfounded liabilities, and that a program which supplements the benefits of these retired officers which does not come from revenues of the pension funds themselves will benefit all citizens of the state and it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year and therefore this act should have effect at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 1701, § 10: April 17, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act must be implemented before the funds described herein are next disbursed in order to insure the fiscal well-being of the beneficiaries of the Police and Fire Pension and Relief Funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1373, § 2: Apr. 15, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the benefits for members of the police and fire pension and relief funds are inadequate; that the benefits are supplemented by the Future Supplement Fund; that those supplemental benefits should be increased to continue to motivate the emergency service employees of our local governments; and that this act is immediately necessary to continue that motivation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 7: Apr. 23, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that premium tax distribution formula is directing state revenues to areas without the need for priority fire and police protection; that police and fire protection services are of extreme importance in the protection of property values and individual lives; that the distribution of premium tax revenues to the areas of the highest need is a top priority; that implementation of a revised distribution formula must be implemented before the normal time for the effectiveness of other laws; and that this act needs to be immediately effective to fulfill that priority. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 609, § 4: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the local police and fire pension and relief funds regarding retirement funding allocations require revision; and that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system. Therefore, an immediate emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 849, § 2: Apr. 3, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that that this act modifies the payment of supplement funds to certain pension funds to provide equitable benefits to the members of those funds; that these funds will be distributed to local police and fire pension and relief funds to be paid to their retired members and beneficiaries; that the payment of these funds will be beneficial to those persons; and that the payments should occur as soon as possible to effectuate the intent of this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 556, § 6: Mar. 22, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 41, § 37: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 500, § 2: Mar. 26, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 522, § 5: Mar. 28, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 465, § 7: May 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes provisions that will impact premium tax distributions that will occur in June of 2019; and that this act is necessary because it will ensure that the operations of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System and the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board as they relate to premium tax distributions will not be interrupted or impaired. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on May 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-11-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accountant” means an accountant who is authorized by Arkansas law to practice public accounting in Arkansas;

“Actuary” means an actuary:

Who is a member of the American Academy of Actuaries or who meets other criteria for qualification which may be established by the General Assembly; and

Who is experienced in retirement plan financing; and

“Plan” means any Arkansas municipal policemen's pension and relief fund or any Arkansas municipal firemen's relief and pension fund, including relief and pension funds of volunteer fire departments.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 700, § 1; 1981, No. 286, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-5701.

24-11-202. Noncompliance with subchapter.

If it is determined that a plan is not complying with the provisions of this subchapter, the Executive Director of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall certify the noncompliance to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, who shall withhold all moneys otherwise due the plan from the state until compliance is achieved.

All actions taken by the executive director shall be subject to review and acceptance by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 700, § 5; 1981, No. 286, § 5; 1983, No. 512, § 4; 1985, No. 383, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-5705; Acts 2001, No. 1701, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3560.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a).